North Carolina, session 2025, SB883.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of Pinetops for
allocation to the public works department operated by the town for equipment needs.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S883-v-1*